Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
ARTICLE 55
PUBLIC LIVESTOCK MARKETS

Section

35-55-101. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Livestock" means horses, mules, cattle, burros, swine, sheep, goats, poultry, and alternative livestock as defined in section 35-41.5-102 (1).

"Public livestock market" means any place, establishment, or facility, commonly known as a livestock market, conducted or operated for compensation or profit as a public livestock market, consisting of pens, or other enclosures, and their appurtenances, in which live horses, mules, cattle, burros, swine, sheep, goats, and poultry are received, held, or assembled for either public or private sale. The person, partnership, or corporation owning or controlling premises defined as a public livestock market shall be compensated for the use of the premises and the services performed in handling the livestock in connection with the sale.

Source:

L. 49:

p. 698, § 2.

CSA:

C. 160, § 209(19).

CRS 53:

§ 8-11-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-11-2.

L. 65:

p. 234, § 2.

L. 94:

(1) amended, p. 1712, § 13, effective July 1.

35-55-102. License requirements.

Any person, partnership, or corporation may procure a license to establish and operate, for a term of one year, a public livestock market within the state of Colorado by making written application to the state board of stock inspection commissioners. The application must provide the following:

The name and address of the applicant, and the names and addresses of all persons having any financial interest in the business;

Proof of financial responsibility of the applicant in the form and amount required by the state board of stock inspection commissioners in accordance with section 35-55-104 or as set forth in the federal "Packers and Stockyards Act, 1921", 7 U.S.C. sec. 181 et seq., as amended;

A legal description of the property and its exact location, with a complete description of the facilities proposed to be used in connection with such public livestock market;

Repealed.

Proof of the ability of the applicant to comply with the federal "Packers and Stockyards Act, 1921", as amended (7 U.S.C. sec. 181 et seq.).

Repealed.

Each such application shall be accompanied by the annual fee as prescribed in section 35-55-103.

To qualify for a license, the applicant must prove ownership of or control by lease of a facility that is adequate as determined by an authorized brand inspector to hold, handle, sort, and inspect livestock.

Repealed.

Every licensed public livestock market shall use forms approved by the state board of stock inspection commissioners for consignment cards, consignors accounts on sale, buyers settlement sheets, and bills of sale to the purchaser.

A public livestock market shall operate on the day of the week designated by the state board of stock inspection commissioners. The operation of a public livestock market in this state without a license is a misdemeanor punishable as provided in section 35-55-117.

Source:

L. 49:

p. 697, § 1.

CSA:

C. 160, § 209(18).

CRS 53:

§ 8-11-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-11-1.

L. 65:

p. 233, § 1.

L. 91:

IP(1) amended, (1)(d) and (4) repealed, and (1)(e) and (1)(f) added, p. 166, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(1)(e) amended, p. 1507, § 57, effective June 1.

L. 2019:

IP(1), (1)(b), and (3) amended and (1)(f) repealed, (SB 19-150), ch. 241, p. 2370, §§ 3, 4, effective May 20.

35-55-103. License fee - rules.

No person shall engage in the operation of a public livestock market within the state of Colorado without first procuring a license from the state board of stock inspection commissioners and paying a fee prescribed by the board in an amount sufficient to cover the administrative costs of the licensing provisions of this article. The license may be renewed by eligible applicants in accordance with an expiration and renewal schedule established in rules promulgated by the commissioner of agriculture. An application for a license to establish and operate public livestock markets shall be in writing upon a blank form to be furnished by the board and shall be accompanied by the fee prescribed by the board pursuant to this section. If the board does not issue a license or renewal, the fee must be returned to the applicant.

Source:

L. 49:

p. 698, § 3.

CSA:

C. 160, § 209(20).

CRS 53:

§ 8-11-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-11-3.

L. 65:

p. 235, § 3.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1711, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 167, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 274, § 11, effective August 5.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (SB 09-115), ch. 61, p. 219, § 4, effective July 1.

35-55-104. Bond.

No license or renewal of license to establish a public livestock market within the state of Colorado may be issued until the applicant has filed evidence of a savings account, deposit, or certificate of deposit meeting the requirements of section 11-35-101, C.R.S., or executed and delivered to this state a surety bond approved and accepted by the state board of stock inspection commissioners upon a form prescribed by the state board. The bond shall be in a penal sum of not less than twenty-five thousand dollars, the amount to be determined by the state board based upon the dollar volume of the business, and shall be issued by a surety company approved by the state board of stock inspection commissioners. Said bond shall be conditioned upon the prompt payment to the rightful owner, upon sale of the livestock so consigned and delivered to the licensee for sale, of all moneys received, less reasonable expenses and agreed commissions chargeable by the licensee and operator of the public livestock market, and also upon full compliance with all of the terms and requirements of this article. When so approved, said bond shall be filed with the state board.

Actions at law may be brought in the name of the state board of stock inspection commissioners upon any such bond, for the use and benefit of any person, firm, or corporation who may suffer loss or damage from violations thereof, but the aggregate liability of the surety for all such losses or damages shall, in no event, exceed the sum of said bond.

Any such public livestock market which is registered under the provisions of the federal "Packers and Stockyards Act, 1921", as amended, and has executed a bond as provided for therein and as is required by the rules and regulations prescribed by the secretary of agriculture, is not required to execute the bond provided for in this article if such bond also guarantees payment of all brand and sanitary inspection fees due this state. Copies of any such license and bond certified by the executive officer of such board may be procured upon payment of a fee of one dollar each, and shall be received as competent evidence in any court in this state.

Source:

L. 49:

p. 698, § 4.

CSA:

C. 160, § 209(21).

L. 51:

p. 787, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 8-11-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-11-4.

L. 65:

p. 235, § 4.

L. 73:

p. 1395, § 6.

L. 79:

(1) amended, p. 426, § 18, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(3) amended, p. 274, § 12, effective August 5.

Cross references:

For the federal "Packers and Stockyards Act, 1921", and amendments thereto, see 7 U.S.C. § 181 et seq.

35-55-105. Posting licenses.

A certified copy of an issued license may be procured by the holder of the original upon payment of a fee of one dollar therefor, and the original or certified copy of said license shall be posted during sale periods in a conspicuous place on the premises where the public livestock market is conducted.

Source:

L. 49:

p. 699, § 5.

CSA:

C. 160, § 209(22).

CRS 53:

§ 8-11-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-11-5.

L. 65:

p. 236, § 5.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 275, § 13, effective August 5.

35-55-106. Board rules.

The state board of stock inspection commissioners may adopt, publish, and enforce rules and regulations necessary for the administration of this article.

Source:

L. 49:

p. 699, § 6.

CSA:

C. 160, § 209(23).

CRS 53:

§ 8-11-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-11-6.

Cross references:

For rule-making procedures, see article 4 of title 24.

35-55-107. Discipline of licensees.

Any violation of the provisions of this article 55 or of any rule adopted and published by the state board of stock inspection commissioners is deemed sufficient cause for the state board of stock inspection commissioners to revoke or suspend the license of the offending operator of the public livestock market or to place on probation the licensee, and the following are specific grounds for the imposition of any of the disciplinary actions specified in this introductory portion:

If the state board of stock inspection commissioners finds the licensee has violated any law of the state of Colorado or official rule or regulation made pursuant thereto governing the intrastate or interstate movement, shipment, or transportation of livestock, or the requirements for brand or health inspection thereof;

If the state board of stock inspection commissioners finds that said licensee has been guilty of fraud or misrepresentation as to the title, brands, or ownership;

If the state board of stock inspection commissioners finds the licensee guilty of buying, receiving, or offering for sale any livestock known by him to be diseased or to have been exposed to infectious or contagious disease;

If the licensee has failed or refused to practice measures of sanitation and inspection as required by law concerning premises or vehicles used for the stabling, yarding, housing, holding, or transporting of animals in the operation of the licensee's public livestock market;

If the state board of stock inspection commissioners finds that the licensee has neglected or refused to keep records and forms of consignment cards, consignors account of sale, and buyers account of sale and bill of sale approved by the state board of stock inspection commissioners required by this article, or rules or regulations made pursuant thereto, or fails or refuses to permit inspection of such records by any authorized agent of said board;

If the state board of stock inspection commissioners finds that the licensee has failed or refused to withhold sale proceeds of any livestock designated by the authorized brand inspector as livestock of which the title is questionable in accordance with section 35-55-114, or if the board finds that the licensee has failed or refused to transmit promptly to said board, after the expiration of thirty days, the proceeds of all livestock to which ownership has not been established in accordance with section 35-55-114;

If the state board of stock inspection commissioners finds that the licensee has issued a company account of purchase which establishes ownership of or transfers title to any cattle, horses, or mules which have not been inspected for brands and ownership or title verified by an authorized Colorado brand inspector immediately prior to or on the licensee's market day designated by the board;

If the state board of stock inspection commissioners finds that the licensee attempted to obtain or obtained a livestock market license by fraud or misrepresentation;

If the state board of stock inspection commissioners finds that the licensee is engaging in or has engaged in advertising which is misleading, deceptive, or false;

If the state board of stock inspection commissioners finds that the licensee has violated or has aided or abetted in the violation of any order of the state board of stock inspection commissioners;

If the state board of stock inspection commissioners finds that the licensee has aided or abetted in the violation of any provision of this article or of any rule or regulation adopted by the state board of stock inspection commissioners pursuant to this article;

If the state board of stock inspection commissioners finds that the licensee has violated or has aided or abetted in the violation of the federal "Packers and Stockyards Act, 1921", as amended (7 U.S.C. sec. 181 et seq.);

If the state board of stock inspection commissioners finds that the licensee has been convicted of or has entered a plea of nolo contendere to a felony for an offense related to the conduct regulated by this article.

When a complaint or an investigation discloses an instance of misconduct which, in the opinion of the state board of stock inspection commissioners, does not warrant formal action but which should not be dismissed as being without merit, the board may send a letter of admonition to any licensed public livestock market operator. Such letter shall be sent to the licensee by certified mail, and a copy thereof sent to the complainant, advising the operator that the operator may, within twenty days after receipt of the letter, make a written request to the board to institute a formal hearing pursuant to section 35-55-108 to determine the propriety of the alleged misconduct. If such request is timely made, the letter of admonition shall be deemed vacated, and the matter shall be processed by means of formal proceedings.

Source:

L. 49:

p. 699, § 7.

CSA:

C. 160, § 209(24).

CRS 53:

§ 8-11-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-11-7.

L. 65:

p. 236, § 6.

L. 71:

p. 168, § 1.

L. 91:

IP(1) amended and (1)(h) to (1)(m) and (2) added, pp. 167, 168, §§ 4, 5, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(2) amended, p. 1645, § 77, effective May 31.

L. 2006:

IP (1) and (1)(l) amended, p. 1507, § 58, effective June 1.

L. 2019:

IP(1) and (1)(d) amended, (SB 19-150), ch. 241, p. 2370, § 5, effective May 20.

Cross references:

For procedure in cancellation of licenses, see § 24-4-104.

35-55-108. Investigation - hearing - administrative law judge.

The state board of stock inspection commissioners, upon its own motion on the basis of reasonable cause or upon the complaint in writing of any person, shall investigate the activities of any licensed livestock market operator or any person who assumes to act in such capacity within the state. Based on the findings of such investigation, the board may initiate proceedings under this article for the discipline of a licensee.

The board shall, through the department of agriculture, employ administrative law judges appointed pursuant to part 10 of article 30 of title 24, C.R.S., to conduct hearings for placing a licensee on probation or for revoking or suspending a license on behalf of the board. The administrative law judges shall conduct such hearings pursuant to the provisions of sections 24-4-104 and 24-4-105, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 49:

p. 700, § 8.

CSA:

C. 160, § 209(25).

CRS 53:

§ 8-11-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-11-8.

L. 65:

p. 236, § 7.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 168, § 6, effective July 1.

35-55-109. Sanitary conditions.

Every public livestock market shall be maintained in a sanitary condition.

Source:

L. 49:

p. 700, § 9.

CSA:

C. 160, § 209(26).

CRS 53:

§ 8-11-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-11-9.

L. 65:

p. 237, § 8.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (SB 19-150), ch. 241, p. 2371, § 6, effective May 20.

35-55-110. Scales.

All scales used in the operation of public livestock markets shall come under and be controlled by Colorado's weights and measures laws.

Source:

L. 49:

p. 700, § 10.

CSA:

C. 160, § 209(27).

CRS 53:

§ 8-11-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-11-10.

L. 65:

p. 237, § 9.

Cross references:

For Colorado's weights and measures laws, see article 14 of this title 35.

35-55-111. Records.

Operators of all public livestock markets shall keep on file an accurate record of the date on which a consignment of animals was received and sold, together with the name and address of the buyer and seller, the number and species of the animals received and sold, and the marks and brands on each animal. Said records together with the gross selling prices, commission, and other proper care, handling, and sale charges on each consignment shall be available for inspection by the executive officer of the state board of stock inspection commissioners, his deputy, or authorized inspector. All records of sales during preceding months shall be kept readily accessible for immediate examination.

Source:

L. 49:

p. 700, § 11.

CSA:

C. 160, § 209(28).

CRS 53:

§ 8-11-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-11-11.

L. 65:

p. 237, § 10.

35-55-112. Brand inspection.

All cattle, horses, mules, and burros, upon entering a public livestock market, shall be inspected for iron brands, earmarks, and other identifying characteristics before being offered for sale. A bill of sale signed by the recorded owner of the brands or no brands or an account of sale showing the brands or no brands on the livestock consigned shall be produced by the consignor. The brand inspector in charge may, in justifiable circumstances, permit the sale of cattle, horses, mules, or burros whose ownership is questionable and then proceed to impound the proceeds of the sale of such animals. After any livestock are consigned to any public livestock market, they shall be held and treated as if the ownership thereof has not been established, until a proper bill of sale or account of sale is produced by the consignor. Such inspections shall be made by authorized brand inspectors who have been approved by the state board of stock inspection commissioners, and a fee per head in the amount prescribed by the state board of stock inspection commissioners pursuant to section 35-41-104, shall be withheld from the consignor's proceeds of sale by the market operator, to be paid to the state board of stock inspection commissioners, for brand inspection on all cattle, horses, mules, and burros.

The authorized brand inspector making the inspection and collecting the fees prescribed shall issue an official brand inspection certificate in duplicate, one copy to be the property of the owner or operator of the auction market, and will be authority for the public livestock market to issue a bill of sale to the purchaser of any livestock sold or disposed of through a licensed livestock auction market, the original to be delivered to the office of the state board of stock inspection commissioners.

Source:

L. 49:

p. 701, § 12.

CSA:

C. 160, § 209(29).

CRS 53:

§ 8-11-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-11-12.

L. 65:

pp. 225, 237, §§ 3, 11.

L. 71:

p. 169, § 1.

L. 75:

(1) amended, p. 1351, § 1, effective May 31.

L. 81:

(1) amended, p. 1711, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 275, § 14, effective August 5.

35-55-113. Veterinary inspection - rules.

An accredited and licensed veterinarian shall inspect all livestock consigned and delivered on the premises of any licensed public livestock market before the livestock are offered for sale. The veterinarian shall inspect or test, as indicated or required, animals consigned to the public livestock market for the purpose of determining their condition of health and freedom from infectious or contagious animal diseases. If, in the opinion of the inspecting veterinarian, the animals are free of clinical signs of infectious or contagious diseases and have not, to the best of the veterinarian's knowledge, been exposed to any infectious or contagious diseases, the veterinarian shall issue a signed certificate of veterinary inspection to any purchaser who so requests. The veterinarian shall deliver the certificate of veterinary inspection to the purchaser at the time of rendering the account of sale or bill of sale.

In addition to the requirements of this subsection (1) for all interstate movements, livestock must meet federal interstate and state of destination requirements. The veterinarian and the public livestock market shall immediately isolate and hold all animals affected with any recognized infectious or contagious diseases in conformity with the health requirements of Colorado law and the rules of the department of agriculture. The operator of the public livestock market shall pay all fees or taxes for veterinary services. The buyer or the person who intends to ship through interstate commerce shall pay the expenses for inspections or tests that are required by the United States department of agriculture and that can only be made by an approved and licensed veterinarian.

Swine may be moved from a public livestock market if, upon inspection, the swine are found free of clinical signs of contagious, infectious, or communicable diseases and in a condition of health.

Repealed.

Feeding swine and breeding swine that are being moved from a market to a farm must be identified by an approved ear tag, individual tattoo, or ear notch as each is required by 9 CFR 71.19. Sows and boars that are being sent to slaughter must be identified in accordance with the market swine identification program as prescribed in the swine brucellosis control/eradication state-federal-industry uniform methods and rules published by the U.S.D.A. animal plant health inspection service agency (APHIS 91-55-042).

No animal may be sold or offered for sale at a public livestock market if the animal is injured, disabled, or diseased beyond recovery, or if such injury or disease permanently renders the animal unfit for human consumption. This subsection (4) includes, but is not limited to, any animal with severe neoplasia, any animal that is unable to rise to its feet by itself, and any animal with obviously fractured long bones.

If, in the judgment of an accredited and licensed veterinarian, an animal presented at a public livestock market is injured, disabled, or diseased beyond recovery, the veterinarian shall humanely euthanize the animal or direct the consignor to immediately remove the animal from the premises of the public livestock market. The consignor is responsible for all expenses incurred for euthanasia and disposal of an animal under this subsection (5). The consignee is not responsible for collection of expenses.

The commissioner of agriculture shall adopt reasonable rules for the administration and enforcement of this section, including, but not limited to, rules designating any disease as a disease that renders livestock permanently disabled or the carcasses thereof permanently unfit for human consumption. The commissioner shall promulgate all such rules in accordance with existing antemortem inspection guidelines of the United States department of agriculture food safety inspection service.

Source:

L. 49:

p. 701, § 13.

CSA:

C. 160, § 209(30).

CRS 53:

§ 8-11-13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-11-13.

L. 65:

pp. 238, 242, 243, §§ 12, 1, 2.

L. 81:

(1) and (2)(a) amended, (2)(b) repealed, and (3) added, pp. 1725, 1726, §§ 1, 2, effective June 18.

L. 96:

(4), (5), and (6) added, p. 1333, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

(1), (2)(a), (3), and (5) amended, (SB 19-150), ch. 241, p. 2371, § 7, effective May 20.

35-55-114. Title.

The operator of each public livestock market in this state shall warrant to the purchaser thereof the title of all livestock sold through his public livestock market and shall be liable to the rightful owner thereof for the net proceeds in cash received for such livestock so sold. It is the further duty of such operator, when notified by the authorized brand inspector that there is a question as to whether any designated livestock sold through said market is lawfully owned by the consignor thereof, to hold the proceeds received from the sale of said livestock for a reasonable time, not to exceed thirty days, to permit the consignor to establish ownership and if at expiration of that time, the consignor fails to establish his lawful ownership of such livestock, said proceeds shall be released by such operator to the state board of stock inspection commissioners, which board has authority to dispose of said proceeds in accordance with Colorado's estray laws relating to the distribution of estray money, and the board's receipt therefor shall relieve said operator from further responsibility for said proceeds. Proof of ownership and an account of all sales of livestock shall be transmitted by the authorized brand inspector to the state board of stock inspection commissioners.

Source:

L. 49:

p. 703, § 14.

CSA:

C. 160, § 209(31).

CRS 53:

§ 8-11-14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-11-14.

L. 65:

p. 239, § 13.

Cross references:

For disposition of the proceeds from the sale of estrays, see § 35-44-106.

35-55-115. Disposition of fees.

All license fees collected from public livestock markets shall be deposited with the state treasurer and shall be placed in the brand inspection fund by the state treasurer for use of the board in paying ordinary expenses of the state board of stock inspection commissioners.

Source:

L. 49:

p. 703, § 15.

CSA:

C. 160, § 209(32).

CRS 53:

§ 8-11-15.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-11-15.

L. 65:

p. 240, § 14.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 275, § 15, effective August 5.

Cross references:

For the brand inspection fund, see § 35-41-102.

35-55-116. Dispersal sales.

All dispersal sales made at public livestock markets shall meet the requirements prescribed for other livestock passing through such markets.

Source:

L. 49:

p. 703, § 16.

CSA:

C. 160, § 209(33).

CRS 53:

§ 8-11-16.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-11-16.

L. 65:

p. 240, § 15.

35-55-117. Penalty.

Any person, partnership, or corporation who violates any provision or requirement of this article 55 or any rule or regulation adopted by the state board of stock inspection commissioners commits a class 2 misdemeanor. It is the duty of the district attorney of the district in which such offense is committed, upon complaint of any private person, or of a sanitary or brand inspector, or of the state board of stock inspection commissioners, to prosecute the same if, after investigation, the district attorney believes a violation has occurred. The state board of stock inspection commissioners, upon its own initiative, or upon complaint of any person, through the attorney general may bring an action in the district court of the district where such offense is committed in the name of the people of this state for an injunction against any person violating any of the provisions of this article 55 or of any rule or regulation adopted by the state board of stock inspection commissioners.

Source:

L. 49:

p. 704, § 17.

CSA:

C. 160, § 209(34).

CRS 53:

§ 8-11-17.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-11-17.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 169, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1552, § 328, effective October 1.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3287, § 662, effective March 1, 2022.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

35-55-118. Denial of license - hearing.

The state board of stock inspection commissioners is empowered to determine summarily whether an applicant for a license to establish and operate a public livestock market meets the requirements set forth in this article or whether there is probable cause to believe that an applicant has committed any of the acts set forth in section 35-55-107 as grounds for discipline. As set forth in this section, "applicant" does not include a renewal applicant.

If the board determines that an applicant does not meet the requirements for licensure set forth in this article or that probable cause exists to believe that an applicant has committed any of the acts set forth in section 35-55-107, the board may withhold or deny the applicant a license. In such instance, the board shall provide such applicant with a statement in writing setting forth the basis of the board's determination.

Should reasonable grounds for controversy over the board's action in issuing or refusing to issue a license develop, a hearing may be conducted by four members of the board. Following such hearing, the board shall affirm, modify, or reverse its prior action in accordance with its findings at such hearing.

Source:

L. 65:

p. 240, § 16.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-11-18.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 169, § 8, effective July 1.

35-55-119. Repeal of article - review of functions.

This article 55 is repealed, effective September 1, 2034. Before the repeal, the licensing of public livestock markets is scheduled for review in accordance with section 24-34-104.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire section added, p. 933, § 31, effective April 28.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 170, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

Entire section amended, p. 174, § 3, effective March 28.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 350, § 20, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (SB 09-115), ch. 61, p. 218, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (SB 19-150), ch. 241, p. 2369, § 2, effective May 20.